public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-xpi/dictionaries/vec.aff
FLAG UTF-8
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđaríatu/O eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđaríe/JLR eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđaríelo/S eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđaríemi/K eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđarò/JL eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđaròmi/K eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđase/I eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđasi eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđasta/I eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđaste/I eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđasti/I eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđasto/I eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđava/JLPR eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđave/JL eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđavi/NP eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđavo/JL eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđe/IJLR eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđede eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđege eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđemo/L eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđen/L eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđendo/E eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđene eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđeni/M eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđense eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđese/I eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđesi eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđesta/I eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđeste/I eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđesti/I eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđesto/I eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđeva/JLPR eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđeve/JL eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđevi/NP eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđevo/JL eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđi/N eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđion/L eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđione eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđioni/M eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđionse eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđisen/L eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđisene eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđiseni/M eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđisense eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđision/L eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđisione eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđisioni/M eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđisionse eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđisié/P eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđisiéde/P eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđisiége/P eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđison/L eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđisone eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđisoni/M eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđisonse eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđiven/L eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđiveni/M eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđivense eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđivion/L eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđivioni/M eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđivionse eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđivié/P eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđiviéu/Q eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđivon/L eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđivoni/M eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđivonse eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđié/P eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđiéde/P eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđiége/P eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđiéu/Q eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđo/JL eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđon/L eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđone eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđoni/M eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđonse eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđà/ eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđàa/JLPR eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđàami/K eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđàau/Q eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđàe/JL eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđàelo/S eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđàemi/K eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđài/NP eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđàimo/L eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđàimoi/M eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđàitu/O eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđàndome/G eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđàndomene/G eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđào/JL eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđàomi/K eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđàrmene/G eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđàsimo eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđàvami/K eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđàvau/Q eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđàvelo/S eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđàvemi/K eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđàvimo/L eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđàvimoi/M eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđàvitu/O eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđàvomi/K eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđè/FP eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđème/H eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđèu/Q eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđé/FP eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđéa/JLPR eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđéami/K eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđéau/Q eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđée/JL eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđéelo/S eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđéemi/K eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđéi/NP eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđéimo/L eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđéimoi/M eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđéitu/O eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđémoi/M eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđéndome/G eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđéndomene/G eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđéo/JL eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđéomi/K eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđésimo eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđéu/Q eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđévami/K eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđévau/Q eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđévelo/S eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđévemi/K eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđévimo/L eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđévimoi/M eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđévitu/O eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚiđévomi/K eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚíđelo/S eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚíđeme/H eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚíđemi/K eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚíđitu/O eraƚiđar
SFX A eraƚiđar araƚíđomi/K eraƚiđar
SFX A eraɉar araɉa/FR eraɉar
SFX A eraɉar araɉada eraɉar
SFX A eraɉar araɉade eraɉar
SFX A eraɉar araɉadi eraɉar
SFX A eraɉar araɉado eraɉar
SFX A eraɉar araɉando/E eraɉar
SFX A eraɉar araɉante/ eraɉar
SFX A eraɉar araɉar/E eraɉar
SFX A eraɉar araɉaralo/S eraɉar
SFX A eraɉar araɉarami/K eraɉar
SFX A eraɉar araɉaratu/O eraɉar
SFX A eraɉar araɉarave/RT eraɉar
SFX A eraɉar araɉare eraɉar
SFX A eraɉar araɉaremo/L eraɉar
SFX A eraɉar araɉaren/L eraɉar
SFX A eraɉar araɉareni/M eraɉar
SFX A eraɉar araɉarense eraɉar
SFX A eraɉar araɉaresi/P eraɉar
SFX A eraɉar araɉaresiu/Q eraɉar
SFX A eraɉar araɉarion/L eraɉar
SFX A eraɉar araɉarioni/M eraɉar
SFX A eraɉar araɉarionse eraɉar
SFX A eraɉar araɉarisen/L eraɉar
SFX A eraɉar araɉariseni/M eraɉar
SFX A eraɉar araɉarisense eraɉar
SFX A eraɉar araɉarision/L eraɉar
SFX A eraɉar araɉarisioni/M eraɉar
SFX A eraɉar araɉarisionse eraɉar
SFX A eraɉar araɉarisié/P eraɉar
SFX A eraɉar araɉarisiéu/Q eraɉar
SFX A eraɉar araɉarison/L eraɉar
SFX A eraɉar araɉarisoni/M eraɉar
SFX A eraɉar araɉarisonse eraɉar
SFX A eraɉar araɉarié/P eraɉar
SFX A eraɉar araɉariéu/Q eraɉar
SFX A eraɉar araɉarme/G eraɉar
SFX A eraɉar araɉaron/L eraɉar
SFX A eraɉar araɉaroni/M eraɉar
SFX A eraɉar araɉaronse eraɉar
SFX A eraɉar araɉarà/JLNR eraɉar
SFX A eraɉar araɉaràe/R eraɉar
SFX A eraɉar araɉarè/JL eraɉar
SFX A eraɉar araɉarèmi/K eraɉar
SFX A eraɉar araɉaré/P eraɉar
SFX A eraɉar araɉarémoi/M eraɉar
SFX A eraɉar araɉarésimo/L eraɉar
SFX A eraɉar araɉarésimoi/M eraɉar
SFX A eraɉar araɉaréu/Q eraɉar
SFX A eraɉar araɉaría/JLNR eraɉar
SFX A eraɉar araɉaríami/K eraɉar
SFX A eraɉar araɉaríatu/O eraɉar
SFX A eraɉar araɉaríe/JLR eraɉar
SFX A eraɉar araɉaríelo/S eraɉar
SFX A eraɉar araɉaríemi/K eraɉar
SFX A eraɉar araɉarò/JL eraɉar
SFX A eraɉar araɉaròmi/K eraɉar
SFX A eraɉar araɉase/I eraɉar
SFX A eraɉar araɉasi eraɉar
SFX A eraɉar araɉasta/I eraɉar
SFX A eraɉar araɉaste/I eraɉar
SFX A eraɉar araɉasti/I eraɉar
SFX A eraɉar araɉasto/I eraɉar
SFX A eraɉar araɉava/JLPR eraɉar
SFX A eraɉar araɉave/JL eraɉar
SFX A eraɉar araɉavi/NP eraɉar
SFX A eraɉar araɉavo/JL eraɉar
SFX A eraɉar araɉe/IJLR eraɉar
SFX A eraɉar araɉede eraɉar
SFX A eraɉar araɉege eraɉar
SFX A eraɉar araɉemo/L eraɉar
SFX A eraɉar araɉen/L eraɉar
SFX A eraɉar araɉendo/E eraɉar
SFX A eraɉar araɉene eraɉar
SFX A eraɉar araɉeni/M eraɉar
SFX A eraɉar araɉense eraɉar
SFX A eraɉar araɉese/I eraɉar
SFX A eraɉar araɉesi eraɉar
SFX A eraɉar araɉesta/I eraɉar
SFX A eraɉar araɉeste/I eraɉar
SFX A eraɉar araɉesti/I eraɉar
SFX A eraɉar araɉesto/I eraɉar
SFX A eraɉar araɉeva/JLPR eraɉar
SFX A eraɉar araɉeve/JL eraɉar
SFX A eraɉar araɉevi/NP eraɉar
SFX A eraɉar araɉevo/JL eraɉar
SFX A eraɉar araɉi/N eraɉar
SFX A eraɉar araɉisen/L eraɉar
SFX A eraɉar araɉisene eraɉar
SFX A eraɉar araɉiseni/M eraɉar
SFX A eraɉar araɉisense eraɉar
SFX A eraɉar araɉision/L eraɉar
SFX A eraɉar araɉisione eraɉar
SFX A eraɉar araɉisioni/M eraɉar
SFX A eraɉar araɉisionse eraɉar
SFX A eraɉar araɉisié/P eraɉar
SFX A eraɉar araɉisiéde/P eraɉar
SFX A eraɉar araɉisiége/P eraɉar
