public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-xpi/dictionaries/vec.dic
alar/A
realdir/A
inalsar/A
andar/A
ankorar/A
arderar/A
armiđar/A
arxarar/A
aŧelerar/A
aumentar/A
axevolar/A
dexbafarar/A
bajar/A
dexbaƚar/A
balegar/A
inbaƚonar/A
rebaltar/A
bandir/A
xbanpir/A
inbarasar/A
inbaretar/A
barxeƚetar/A
batedar/A
batolar/A
dexbautar/A
baxotar/A
bekonar/A
xberlúxer/A
strabéver/A
xbiankeđar/A
bibiatar/A
inbindelar/A
inbironar/A
bixegolar/A
rebóɉer/A
dexbokar/A
dexbolar/A
bonir/A
rebondoƚar/A
bordeƚar/A
xbosegar/A
botixar/A
dexbosoƚar/A
bragar/A
bramidar/A
braŧolar/A
brevetar/A
xbriñar/A
dexbrokar/A
xbronkoƚar/A
bruskinar/A
bufonar/A
inbusoƚotar/A
xbuxetar/A
scapar/A
incavetar/A
intracèñer/A
recéñer/A
cilar/A
scokixar/A
predir/A
indebitar/A
dexdeñar/A
dexertar/A
indivinar/A
indogar/A
doloxar/A
domisiƚiar/A
dormir/A
xdotorexar/A
dubitar/A
inđalar/A
đavajar/A
đogar/A
malđontar/A
sodónxer/A
đugar/A
xurar/A
èser/A
reelèder/A
inerbar/A
evínŧer/A
exitar/A
sorafar/A
sfakinar/A
faƚivar/A
fameliariđar/A
desfarinar/A
rinfaŧar/A
favorir/A
paƚifegar/A
femenar/A
desferar/A
festeđar/A
dexinfiar/A
fiaskar/A
fifar/A
sfilar/A
rafinar/A
sfioređar/A
fiskar/A
influir/A
sfogonar/A
foƚexar/A
sforbedar/A
formaƚixar/A
raforŧar/A
fradeliđar/A
frànđer/A
fraskeđar/A
sfraselar/A
sfregoƚar/A
infrincar/A
konfrontar/A
transfugar/A
profumegar/A
fusiƚar/A
ingalar/A
dexgaƚetar/A
ingaƚusar/A
ingansar/A
xgarbeƚar/A
ingarofoƚir/A
ingaxetar/A
globolar/A
paragonar/A
xgorgedar/A
xgrafiñar/A
dexgrandenar/A
dexgrasar/A
dexgravar/A
ingrejar/A
xgretoƚir/A
xgriñaŧar/A
xgrisolar/A
dexgropar/A
inguantar/A
xguaratar/A
xguinsar/A
idratar/A
inestar/A
inkiostrar/A
inritar/A
intraɉar/A
introitar/A
xɉanŧar/A
xjaŧar/A
ɉelomarar/A
rejetar/A
ɉosar/A
xɉosolar/A
jutar/A
inkaenar/A
inkajar/A
kalivar/A
inkalmar/A
rekalsar/A
kamufar/A
skaneƚar/A
inkankrenir/A
inkantexemar/A
inkaparar/A
inkaponar/A
karameƚar/A
inkargar/A
inkaroñar/A
skartexar/A
kasegar/A
inkatarar/A
kativar/A
prekasar/A
kavalar/A
kavilar/A
konklúder/A
arkòjer/A
skokonar/A
kolorar/A
komandar/A
inkomodar/A
skonfuxionar/A
konpletar/A
deskontentar/A
deskonsar/A
akorar/A
skoraɉir/A
inakòrxer/A
inkorniđar/A
skorsixar/A
inkotoƚar/A
kovèrxer/A
kréder/A
krestaƚixar/A
krokar/A
krostoƚar/A
krupolidar/A
inkuartar/A
deskuèrxer/A
kukar/A
skuƚasar/A
skurioxar/A
deskúxer/A
xlangolir/A
ƚansar/A
delapidar/A
ƚaskar/A
ƚavar/A
lèder/A
ƚegaƚixar/A
leskar/A
relevar/A
ƚiberar/A
ligar/A
limitar/A
ƚisegar/A
lokar/A
prolongar/A
alosar/A
xlubiar/A
deƚuviar/A
madurar/A
xmakar/A
xmalsar/A
inmanetar/A
mantexar/A
xmañusar/A
mariđar/A
martoridar/A
xmaseƚar/A
xmatar/A
inmasar/A
maxerar/A
intermeđar/A
meƚar/A
menestrar/A
inxmerdar/A
desprométer/A
traxméter/A
xmilŧir/A
misiar/A
xmogar/A
molar/A
xmoltonar/A
remontar/A
demoralixar/A
xmoroxar/A
mostrar/A
xmòver/A
muɉar/A
xmusar/A
muxegar/A
naspar/A
negar/A
inobelir/A
anuir/A
dexobedir/A
òlder/A
operar/A
orsar/A
padriđar/A
inpalar/A
spalpeđar/A
panteđar/A
parecar/A
partisionar/A
inpastiđar/A
inspaŧientar/A
inpegolar/A
spelumar/A
penoƚar/A
inperlar/A
petedolar/A
inpesoƚatar/A
konpiàxer/A
pinŧar/A
pospoƚar/A
plakar/A
despolverar/A
ponarar/A
pontolar/A
inposesar/A
strapregar/A
dexinprimar/A
spulexar/A
pusar/A
rajonar/A
raspar/A
rekuixir/A
retribuir/A
dexrisolar/A
surogar/A
roñir/A
irudenir/A
ruxar/A
strasalir/A
sanar/A
scafeđar/A
sekar/A
suseguitar/A
semolar/A
sepeƚir/A
sfrixegar/A
sincerar/A
skalpolar/A
skarsexar/A
skisetar/A
skrisoƚar/A
resolar/A
resomeɉar/A
insoŧolar/A
spaŧiar/A
spifarar/A
respónder/A
instafar/A
staŧar/A
destínguer/A
stomegar/A
konstrénxer/A
strusiar/A
sufragar/A
susar/A
takidar/A
intardigar/A
taveƚar/A
sotinténder/A
inténxer/A
detéñer/A
detestar/A
tiviar/A
tonexar/A
stortar/A
intovajar/A
trangujar/A
trasar/A
tridar/A
tronexar/A
sakar/A
savarjar/A
senjar/A
sernir/A
desíder/A
sinkuantar/A
ŧiviliđar/A
ŧotiñar/A
ustar/A
invalidar/A
varkar/A
revelar/A
xventoƚar/A
pervèñer/A
invergoƚar/A
pervèrter/A
videgar/A
vitaƚixar/A
evokar/A
voltolar/A
xaoƚar/A
inxeƚoxir/A
xlapañar/A
xufolar/A
korespónder/A
deportar/A
kontrobàter/A
buƚigar/A
inpiturar/A
racar/A
skusar/A
spaurir/A
frekuentar/A
